Louisiana, session 2026, HB1151.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:601.8 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§601.8. Equity interests
A. An insurer may acquire preferred stocks in any United States business
entity if, as a result of and after giving effect to the investment:
(1) Securities of a single issuer and its affiliates, other than the government
of the United States and subsidiaries authorized pursuant to R.S. 22:691.3, shall no
exceed three percent of admitted assets.
(2) The aggregate amount of preferred stocks then held by the insurer under
this Subsection does not exceed twenty-five percent of its admitted assets.
B. An insurer may acquire equity interests in solvent business entities that
meet any of the following criteria:
(1) Domiciled in the United States.
(2) Domiciled in a foreign jurisdiction if listed on a qualified exchange.
(3) Permitted pursuant to R.S. 22:601.12.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1151 ENROLLED
C. B.(1) A life insurer shall not acquire an investment pursuant to this
Section if, as a result of and after giving effect to the investment, any of the
following would occur:
(a) The aggregate amount of all equity interests then held by the insurer
would exceed twenty percent of its admitted assets.
(b) The amount of equity interests then held by the insurer that are not listed
on a qualified exchange would exceed five percent of its admitted assets.
(2) A life insurer shall not acquire any investments that the insurer may
acquire pursuant to another Section of this Subpart, if the acquisition would result
in the life insurer exceeding the limitations set forth in this Section.
(3) A life insurer shall not short sell equity investments, unless the insurer
covers the short sale by owning the equity investment or an unrestricted right to the
equity instrument exercisable within six months of the short sale.
(4) The provisions of this Subsection do not apply to an accident or health
insurer who files under a life insurer. Such insurer shall be subject to the provisions
of Subsection C of this Section.
C. For insurers other than life insurers:
(1) An insurer may acquire preferred stocks in any United States business
entity if, as a result of and after giving effect to the investment, the following
requirements are met:
(a) Securities of a single issuer and its affiliates, other than the government
of the United States and subsidiaries authorized pursuant to R.S. 22:691.3, do not
exceed three percent of admitted assets.
(b) The aggregate amount of preferred stocks then held by the insurer
pursuant to this Subsection does not exceed twenty-five percent of its admitted
assets.
(2) An insurer shall not acquire an investment pursuant to this Section if, as
a result of and after giving effect to the investment:
(1) (a) The aggregate amount of investments then held by the insurer under
pursuant to this Section, excluding exchange-traded funds and mutual funds, would
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1151 ENROLLED
exceed fifty percent of its admitted assets, or the amount of equity interests then held
by the insurer that are not listed on a qualified exchange would exceed five percent
of its admitted assets.
(2) (b) The aggregate amount of exchange-traded fund and mutual fund
investments then held by the insurer under pursuant to this Section would exceed the
greater of fifty percent of its admitted assets or one hundred percent of its surplus as
regards policyholders. The investment in any one fund shall be limited to ten percent
of admitted assets.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of this Subsection to the contrary, the
aggregate amount of all equity interests then held by the insurer pursuant to this
Section, including preferred stocks, exchange-traded funds, mutual funds, and any
other equity interests whether held directly or indirectly, shall not exceed the greater
of fifty percent of the insurer's admitted assets or one hundred percent of the insurer's
surplus as regards policyholders.
D. If the commissioner considers it desirable in order to properly evaluate
the investment portfolio of an insurer, the commissioner may require that
investments in exchange-traded funds, mutual funds, pooled investment vehicles, or
other investment companies be treated for purposes of this Subpart as if the investor
owned directly its proportional share of the assets owned by the exchange-traded
fund, mutual fund, pooled investment vehicle, or investment company.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.